test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-F-Ж_А-башня_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - башня M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: ба́шня
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: ба́шню
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: ба́шни
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: ба́шне
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: ба́шне
      башня+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: ба́шней
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ба́шни
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ба́шни
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: ба́шен
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: ба́шнях
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: ба́шням
      башня+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: ба́шнями
